Utah statutes.
78B-14-319.   Receipt and disbursement of payments.
(1)  A support-enforcement agency or tribunal of this state shall disburse
promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as directed by the
order.  The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal
of another state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the
amounts and dates of all payments received.
(2)  If neither the obligor, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the
child resides in this state, upon request from the support-enforcement agency
of this state or another state, the Office of Recovery Services or a tribunal
of this state shall:
(a)  direct that the support payment be made to the support-enforcement agency
in the state in which the obligee is receiving services; and
(b)  issue and send to the obligor's employer a conforming income-withholding
order or an administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the
redirected payments.
(3)  The support-enforcement agency of this state receiving redirected
payments from another state pursuant to a law similar to Subsection (2) shall
furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified
statement by the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all
payments received.
